Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-124
Precinct, township, or school district bonds; duty of county clerk; record; contents; fee.

It shall be the duty of the county clerk, in a book prepared for that purpose, to record the question submitted, the notice and proof of publication, the return of votes for and against; and the fee for so doing, to be paid by the precinct, township, or school district board or officers, as the case may be, shall be the same as charged for the recording of deeds and mortgages.

G.S.1873, c. 63, § 2, p. 884;

R.S.1913, § 389;

C.S.1922, § 306;

C.S.1929, § 11-125;

R.S.1943, § 10-124.